Utah statutes.
17B-1-1204.   Notice of the hearing on a validation petition -- Amended or supplemented validation petition.

(1)  Upon the entry of an order under Section 17B-1-1203 setting a hearing on a validation petition, the local district that filed the petition shall:

(a)  publish notice:

(i)  at least once a week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the principal office of the district is located; and

(ii) on the Utah Public Notice Website created in Section 63F-1-701, for three weeks immediately before the hearing; and

(b)  post notice in its principal office at least 21 days before the date set for the hearing.

(2)  Each notice under Subsection (1) shall:

(a)  state the date, time, and place of the hearing on the validation petition;

(b)  include a general description of the contents of the validation petition; and

(c)  if applicable, state the location where a complete copy of a contract that is the subject of the validation petition may be examined.

(3)  If a district amends or supplements a validation petition under Subsection 17B-1-1202(3) after publishing and posting notice as required under Subsection (1), the district is not required to publish or post notice again unless required by the court.



Amended by Chapter 90, 2010 General Session

